Illinois, session 104th, SB508.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Rural Economic Development Act is amended 5by changing Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 710/1-1)  (from Ch. 5, par. 2201-1)7    Sec. 1-1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as 8the "Rural Economic Development Act".9(Source: P.A. 84-1452.)